es: Servicios > Servicios de entretenimiento y ocio: Actividades para niños; Conciertos y espectáculos; Planificación de eventos; Actividades en el interior; Actividades al aire libre; Viajes y ocio
pt-PT: Serviços > Serviços de entretenimento e recreação: Atividades infantis; Concertos e eventos de entretenimento; Planeamento de eventos; Atividades de interior; Atividades de exterior; Viagens e lazer
zh-CN: 服务 > 娱乐/休闲服务: 儿童活动; 音乐会和娱乐活动; 活动策划; 室内活动; 户外活动; 旅游与休闲
sl-SI: Storitve > Razvedrilne in rekreacijske storitve: Otroške dejavnosti; Koncerti in zabavni dogodki; Načrtovanje dogodkov; Dejavnosti v zaprtih prostorih; Dejavnosti na prostem; Potovanja in prosti čas
ro-RO: Servicii > Servicii de divertisment și recreere: Activități pentru copii; Concerte și evenimente de divertisment; Planificare evenimente; Activități de interior; Activități în aer liber; Călătorii și agrement
th: บริการ > บริการด้านความบันเทิงและสันทนาการ: กิจกรรมเด็ก; คอนเสิร์ตและงานบันเทิง; การวางแผนงานอีเว้นท์; กิจกรรมในร่ม; กิจกรรมกลางแจ้ง; การเดินทางและพักผ่อนหย่อนใจ
da: Service > Underholdning og fritidstjenester: Børneaktiviteter; Koncerter og underholdningsbegivenheder; Eventplanlægning; Indendørsaktiviteter; Udendørsaktiviteter; Rejser og fritid
tr: Servisler > Eğlence ve Rekreasyon Hizmetleri: Çocuk Aktiviteleri; Konserler ve Eğlence Etkinlikleri; Olay kurgulama; Kapalı Alan Aktiviteleri; Açık Hava Aktiviteleri; Seyahat ve Eğlence
bg-BG: Услуги > Услуги за развлечение и отдих: Занимания за деца; Концерти и развлекателни събития; Планиране на събития; Занимания на закрито; Занимания на открито; Пътуване и свободно време
lt-LT: Paslaugos > Pramogų ir poilsio paslaugos: Veikla vaikams; Koncertai ir pramoginiai renginiai; Renginių planavimas; Užsiėmimai patalpose; Užsiėmimai lauke; Kelionės ir laisvalaikis
zh-TW: 維修 > 娛樂休閒服務: 兒童活動; 音樂會/娛樂活動; 活動企劃; 室內活動; 戶外活動; 旅遊與休閒
nl: Diensten > Entertainment- en recreatiediensten: Kinderactiviteiten; Concerten en entertainment; Evenementenplanning; Binnenactiviteiten; Buitenactiviteiten; Reizen en vrijetijdsbesteding
de: Dienstleistungen > Belustigungs- und Freizeitdienstleistungen: Aktivitäten für Kinder; Konzerte und Unterhaltungsveranstaltungen; Eventplanung; Innenaktivitäten; Außenaktivitäten; Reisen und Freizeit
hu: Szolgáltatások > Szórakoztatási és szabadidős szolgáltatások: Gyermektevékenységek; Koncertek és szórakoztató rendezvények; Rendezvényszervezés; Beltéri tevékenységek; Kültéri tevékenységek; Utazás és szabadidő
hr-HR: Usluge > Usluge zabave i rekreacije: Dječje aktivnosti; Koncerti i zabavni događaji; Planiranje događaja; Aktivnosti u zatvorenom prostoru; Aktivnosti na otvorenom; Putovanja i slobodno vrijeme
en: Services > Entertainment & Recreation Services: Children Activities; Concerts & Entertainment Events; Event Planning; Indoor Activities; Outdoor Activities; Travel & Leisure
ja: サービス > エンターテイメント・レクリエーションサービス: 子供向けアクティビティ; コンサート&エンターテイメントイベント; イベント企画; 屋内アクティビティ; 屋外アクティビティ; 旅行&レジャー
cs: Služby > Služby v oblasti zábavy a rekreace: Dětské aktivity; Koncerty a zábavní akce; Plánování akcí; Aktivity v interiéru; Outdoorové aktivity; Cestování a volný čas
fr: Services > Services de divertissement et de loisirs: Activités pour enfants; Concerts et événements de divertissement; Planification d’événements; Activités d’intérieur; Activités d’extérieur; Voyages et loisirs
nb: Tjenester > Underholdnings- og rekreasjonstjenester: Barneaktiviteter; Konsert- og underholdningsarrangementer; Eventplanlegging; Innendørsaktiviteter; Utendørsaktiviteter; Reise- og fritid
it: Servizi > Servizi di intrattenimento e ricreativi: Attività per bambini; Concerti ed eventi di intrattenimento; Pianificazione di eventi; Attività al chiuso; Attività all’aperto; Viaggio e tempo libero
ru: Услуги > Услуги по организации отдыха и развлечений: Мероприятия для детей; Концерты и развлекательные мероприятия; Планирование мероприятий; Мероприятия в помещении; Мероприятия на открытом воздухе; Путешествия и отдых
ko: 서비스 > 엔터테인먼트/레크리에이션 서비스: 어린이 활동; 콘서트/엔터테인먼트 서비스; 행사 기획; 실내 활동; 야외 활동; 여행/레저
el: Υπηρεσίες > Υπηρεσίες ψυχαγωγίας & αναψυχής: Δραστηριότητες για παιδιά; Συναυλίες & ψυχαγωγικές εκδηλώσεις; Σχεδιασμός εκδηλώσεων; Δραστηριότητες εσωτερικού χώρου; Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες; Ταξίδια & αναψυχή
sk-SK: Servis > Zábavné a rekreačné služby: Aktivity pre deti; Koncerty a zábavné podujatia; Plánovanie podujatí; Interiérové aktivity; Exteriérové aktivity; Cestovanie a voľný čas
pl: Usługi > Usługi rozrywkowe i rekreacyjne: Zajęcia dla dzieci; Koncerty i wydarzenia rozrywkowe; Planowanie wydarzeń; Zajęcia wewnątrz pomieszczeń; Zajęcia na dworze; Podróże i wypoczynek
sv: Tjänster > Underhållnings- och rekreationstjänster: Barnaktiviteter; Konserter och underhållningsevenemang; Evenemangsplanering; Inomhusaktiviteter; Utomhusaktiviteter; Resor och fritid
pt-BR: Serviços > Serviços de entretenimento e recreação: Atividades infantis; Concertos e eventos de entretenimento; Planejamento de eventos; Atividades internas; Atividades ao ar livre; Viagens e lazer
vi: Dịch vụ > Dịch vụ giải trí & tiêu khiển: Hoạt động dành cho trẻ em; Buổi hòa nhạc & sự kiện giải trí; Tổ chức sự kiện; Hoạt động trong nhà; Hoạt động ngoài trời; Dịch vụ du lịch & giải trí
fi: Huollot > Viihde- ja virkistyspalvelut: Lasten aktiviteetit; Konsertit ja viihdetapahtumat; Tapahtumasuunnittelu; Sisäaktiviteetit; Ulkoaktiviteetit; Matkailu ja vapaa-aika